Utah statutes.
76-7-315.   Exceptions to certain requirements in serious medical emergencies.

When due to a serious medical emergency, time does not permit compliance with Section 76-7-302, 76-7-305, 76-7-305.5, 76-7-308.5, or 76-7-310.5 the provisions of those sections do not apply.

